Tennessee, session 114, SB2388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-106, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) In any case where an autopsy is requested by a municipality or municipal law
enforcement agency, the cost of the autopsy must be paid by the municipality, unless
the cost is paid by the state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-109, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) In any case where an autopsy is requested by a municipality or municipal law
enforcement agency, the cost of the autopsy must be paid by the municipality, unless
the cost is paid by the state.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-303(i)(1), is amended by
deleting "ten dollars ($10.00)" and substituting "fifteen dollars ($15.00)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-313(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "ten dollars ($10.00)" and substituting "fifteen dollars ($15.00)".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201, is amended by deleting
subdivision (c)(3) and substituting:
(3) A violation of subdivision (b)(2)(C) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2388
012240
- 1 -